src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_alga_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kálgu: # ok LAIGU
    kálgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Acc:  káálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálgun
    kálgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálgust
    kálgu+N+Sg+Com:  kálgoin
    kálgu+N+Sg+Abe:  kálguttáá
    kálgu+N+Ess:  kálgun
    kálgu+N+Par:  kálgud
    kálgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káálguh
    kálgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálgui, kálgui]
    kálgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káálguid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálgoid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káálguin
    kálgu+N+Pl+Com:  [kálguiguin, kálguigijn]
    kálgu+N+Pl+Abe:  kálguittáá

  Noun - kárgu: # ok LAIGU
    kárgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Acc:  káárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káárgun
    kárgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káárgust
    kárgu+N+Sg+Com:  kárgoin
    kárgu+N+Sg+Abe:  kárguttáá
    kárgu+N+Ess:  kárgun
    kárgu+N+Par:  kárgud
    kárgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káárguh
    kárgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káárgui, kárgui]
    kárgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káárguid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kárgoid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káárguin
    kárgu+N+Pl+Com:  [kárguiguin, kárguigijn]
    kárgu+N+Pl+Abe:  kárguittáá


  Noun - ármu: # ok LAIGU
    ármu+N+Sg+Nom:  ármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Gen:  áármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Acc:  áármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Ill:  áármun
    ármu+N+Sg+Loc:  áármust
    ármu+N+Sg+Com:  ármoin
    ármu+N+Sg+Abe:  ármuttáá
    ármu+N+Ess:  ármun
    ármu+N+Par:  ármud
    ármu+N+Pl+Nom:  áármuh
    ármu+N+Pl+Gen: [áármui, ármui]
    ármu+N+Pl+Acc:  áármuid
    ármu+N+Pl+Ill:  ármoid
    ármu+N+Pl+Loc:  áármuin
    ármu+N+Pl+Com:  [ármuiguin, ármuigijn]
    ármu+N+Pl+Abe:  ármuittáá


  Noun - vávnu: # ok LAIGU
    vávnu+N+Sg+Nom:  vávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Gen:  váávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Acc:  váávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Ill:  váávnun
    vávnu+N+Sg+Loc:  váávnust
    vávnu+N+Sg+Com:  vávnoin
    vávnu+N+Sg+Abe:  vávnuttáá
    vávnu+N+Ess:  vávnun
    vávnu+N+Par:  vávnud
    vávnu+N+Pl+Nom:  váávnuh
    vávnu+N+Pl+Gen: [váávnui, vávnui]
    vávnu+N+Pl+Acc:  váávnuid
    vávnu+N+Pl+Ill:  vávnoid
    vávnu+N+Pl+Loc:  váávnuin
    vávnu+N+Pl+Com:  [vávnuiguin, vávnuigijn]
    vávnu+N+Pl+Abe:  vávnuittáá

  Noun - áptu: # ok LAIGU
    áptu+N+Sg+Nom:  áptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááptun
    áptu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááptust
    áptu+N+Sg+Com:  áptoin
    áptu+N+Sg+Abe:  áptuttáá
    áptu+N+Ess:  áptun
    áptu+N+Par:  áptud
    áptu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááptuh
    áptu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááptui, áptui]
    áptu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááptuid
    áptu+N+Pl+Ill:  áptoid
    áptu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááptuin
    áptu+N+Pl+Com:  [áptuiguin, áptuigijn]
    áptu+N+Pl+Abe:  áptuittáá

  Noun - vástu: # ok LAIGU
    vástu+N+Sg+Nom:  vástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Gen:  váástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Acc:  váástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Ill:  váástun
    vástu+N+Sg+Loc:  váástust
    vástu+N+Sg+Com:  vástoin
    vástu+N+Sg+Abe:  vástuttáá
    vástu+N+Ess:  vástun
    vástu+N+Par:  vástud
    vástu+N+Pl+Nom:  váástuh
    vástu+N+Pl+Gen: [váástui, vástui]
    vástu+N+Pl+Acc:  váástuid
    vástu+N+Pl+Ill:  vástoid
    vástu+N+Pl+Loc:  váástuin
    vástu+N+Pl+Com:  [vástuiguin, vástuigijn]
    vástu+N+Pl+Abe:  vástuittáá


  Noun - kálvu: # ok LAIGU
    kálvu+N+Sg+Nom:  kálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Acc:  káálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálvun
    kálvu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálvust
    kálvu+N+Sg+Com:  kálvoin
    kálvu+N+Sg+Abe:  kálvuttáá
    kálvu+N+Ess:  kálvun
    kálvu+N+Par:  kálvud
    kálvu+N+Pl+Nom:  káálvuh
    kálvu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálvui, kálvui]
    kálvu+N+Pl+Acc:  káálvuid
    kálvu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálvoid
    kálvu+N+Pl+Loc:  káálvuin
    kálvu+N+Pl+Com:  [kálvuiguin, kálvuigijn]
    kálvu+N+Pl+Abe:  kálvuittáá

  Noun - árvu: # ok LAIGU
    árvu+N+Sg+Nom:  árvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Gen:  áárvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Acc:  áárvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Ill:  áárvun
    árvu+N+Sg+Loc:  áárvust
    árvu+N+Sg+Com:  árvoin
    árvu+N+Sg+Abe:  árvuttáá
    árvu+N+Ess:  árvun
    árvu+N+Par:  árvud
    árvu+N+Pl+Nom:  áárvuh
    árvu+N+Pl+Gen: [áárvui, árvui]
    árvu+N+Pl+Acc:  áárvuid
    árvu+N+Pl+Ill:  árvoid
    árvu+N+Pl+Loc:  áárvuin
    árvu+N+Pl+Com:  [árvuiguin, árvuigijn]
    árvu+N+Pl+Abe:  árvuittáá

  Noun - várvu: # ok LAIGU
    várvu+N+Sg+Nom:  várvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Gen:  váárvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Acc:  váárvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Ill:  váárvun
    várvu+N+Sg+Loc:  váárvust
    várvu+N+Sg+Com:  várvoin
    várvu+N+Sg+Abe:  várvuttáá
    várvu+N+Ess:  várvun
    várvu+N+Par:  várvud
    várvu+N+Pl+Nom:  váárvuh
    várvu+N+Pl+Gen: [váárvui, várvui]
    várvu+N+Pl+Acc:  váárvuid
    várvu+N+Pl+Ill:  várvoid
    várvu+N+Pl+Loc:  váárvuin
    várvu+N+Pl+Com:  [várvuiguin, várvuigijn]
    várvu+N+Pl+Abe:  várvuittáá

  Noun - ákšu: # ok LAIGU
    ákšu+N+Sg+Nom:  ákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Gen:  áákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Acc:  áákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Ill:  áákšun
    ákšu+N+Sg+Loc:  áákšust
    ákšu+N+Sg+Com:  ákšoin
    ákšu+N+Sg+Abe:  ákšuttáá
    ákšu+N+Ess:  ákšun
    ákšu+N+Par:  ákšud
    ákšu+N+Pl+Nom:  áákšuh
    ákšu+N+Pl+Gen: [áákšui, ákšui]
    ákšu+N+Pl+Acc:  áákšuid
    ákšu+N+Pl+Ill:  ákšoid
    ákšu+N+Pl+Loc:  áákšuin
    ákšu+N+Pl+Com:  [ákšuiguin, ákšuigijn]
    ákšu+N+Pl+Abe:  ákšuittáá

  Noun - skálžu: # ok LAIGU
    skálžu+N+Sg+Nom:  skálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Gen:  skáálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Acc:  skáálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Ill:  skáálžun
    skálžu+N+Sg+Loc:  skáálžust
    skálžu+N+Sg+Com:  skálžoin
    skálžu+N+Sg+Abe:  skálžuttáá
    skálžu+N+Ess:  skálžun
    skálžu+N+Par:  skálžud
    skálžu+N+Pl+Nom:  skáálžuh
    skálžu+N+Pl+Gen: [skáálžui, skálžui]
    skálžu+N+Pl+Acc:  skáálžuid
    skálžu+N+Pl+Ill:  skálžoid
    skálžu+N+Pl+Loc:  skáálžuin
    skálžu+N+Pl+Com:  [skálžuiguin, skálžuigijn]
    skálžu+N+Pl+Abe:  skálžuittáá

  Noun - ráiđu: # ok LAIGU
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Nom:  ráiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Gen:  rááiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Acc:  rááiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Ill:  rááiđun
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Loc:  rááiđust
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Com:  ráiđoin
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Abe:  ráiđuttáá
    ráiđu+N+Ess:  ráiđun
    ráiđu+N+Par:  ráiđud
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Nom:  rááiđuh
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Gen: [rááiđui, ráiđui]
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Acc:  rááiđuid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Ill:  ráiđoid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Loc:  rááiđuin
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Com:  [ráiđuiguin, ráiđuigijn]
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Abe:  ráiđuittáá

  Noun - ávju: # ok LAIGU
    ávju+N+Sg+Nom:  ávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Gen:  áávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Acc:  áávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Ill:  áávjun
    ávju+N+Sg+Loc:  áávjust
    ávju+N+Sg+Com:  ávjoin
    ávju+N+Sg+Abe:  ávjuttáá
    ávju+N+Ess:  ávjun
    ávju+N+Par:  ávjud
    ávju+N+Pl+Nom:  áávjuh
    ávju+N+Pl+Gen: [áávjui, ávjui]
    ávju+N+Pl+Acc:  áávjuid
    ávju+N+Pl+Ill:  ávjoid
    ávju+N+Pl+Loc:  áávjuin
    ávju+N+Pl+Com:  [ávjuiguin, ávjuigijn]
    ávju+N+Pl+Abe:  ávjuittáá

  Noun - sátku: # ok LAIGU
    sátku+N+Sg+Nom:  sátku
    sátku+N+Sg+Gen:  sááđhu
    sátku+N+Sg+Acc:  sááđhu
    sátku+N+Sg+Ill:  sáátkun
    sátku+N+Sg+Loc:  sááđhust
    sátku+N+Sg+Com:  sáđhoin
    sátku+N+Sg+Abe:  sáđhuttáá
    sátku+N+Ess:  sátkun
    sátku+N+Par:  sátkud
    sátku+N+Pl+Nom:  sááđhuh
    sátku+N+Pl+Gen: [sááđhui, sáđhui]
    sátku+N+Pl+Acc:  sááđhuid
    sátku+N+Pl+Ill:  sáđhoid
    sátku+N+Pl+Loc:  sááđhuin
    sátku+N+Pl+Com:  [sáđhuiguin, sáđhuigijn]
    sátku+N+Pl+Abe:  sáđhuittáá

  Noun - rášku: # ok LAIGU
    rášku+N+Sg+Nom:  rášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Gen:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Acc:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Ill:  rááškun
    rášku+N+Sg+Loc:  rááškust
    rášku+N+Sg+Com:  ráškoin
    rášku+N+Sg+Abe:  ráškuttáá
    rášku+N+Ess:  ráškun
    rášku+N+Par:  ráškud
    rášku+N+Pl+Nom:  rááškuh
    rášku+N+Pl+Gen: [rááškui, ráškui]
    rášku+N+Pl+Acc:  rááškuid
    rášku+N+Pl+Ill:  ráškoid
    rášku+N+Pl+Loc:  rááškuin
    rášku+N+Pl+Com:  [ráškuiguin, ráškuigijn]
    rášku+N+Pl+Abe:  ráškuittáá

  Noun - nieidâ:
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Nom: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Gen: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Acc: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Ill: nieidân
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Loc: nieidâst
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Com: nieidáin
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Abe: nieidâttáá
    nieidâ+N+Ess: nieidân
    nieidâ+N+Par: nieidâd
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Nom: nieidah
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Gen: nieidâi
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Acc: nieidâid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Ill: nieidáid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Loc: nieidâin
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Com: [nieidâiguin, nieidâigijn]
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Abe: nieidâittáá

  Noun - ruoidâ:
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruoidân
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruoidâst
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Com: ruoidáin
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruoidâttáá
    ruoidâ+N+Ess: ruoidân
    ruoidâ+N+Par: ruoidâd
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruoidah
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Gen: ruoidâi
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruoidâid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruoidáid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruoidâin
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Com: [ruoidâiguin, ruoidâigijn]
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruoidâittáá

  Noun - mielgâ:
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Ill: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâst
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Com: mielgáin
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâttáá
    mielgâ+N+Ess: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Par: mielgâd
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Nom: mielgah
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Gen: mielgâi
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Ill: mielgáid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Com: [mielgâiguin, mielgâigijn]
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâittáá

  Noun - kuorgâ:
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuorgâst
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Com: kuorgáin
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuorgâttáá
    kuorgâ+N+Ess: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Par: kuorgâd
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuorgah
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Gen: kuorgâi
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuorgâid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuorgáid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuorgâin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Com: [kuorgâiguin, kuorgâigijn]
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuorgâittáá

  Noun - vuovdâ:
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuovdâst
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Com: vuovdáin
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuovdâttáá
    vuovdâ+N+Ess: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Par: vuovdâd
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuovdah
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Gen: vuovdâi
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuovdâid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuovdáid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuovdâin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Com: [vuovdâiguin, vuovdâigijn]
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuovdâittáá

  Noun - čuoškâ:
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Nom: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Gen: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Acc: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Ill: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Loc: čuoškâst
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Com: čuoškáin
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Abe: čuoškâttáá
    čuoškâ+N+Ess: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Par: čuoškâd
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Nom: čuoškah
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Gen: čuoškâi
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Acc: čuoškâid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Ill: čuoškáid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Loc: čuoškâin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Com: [čuoškâiguin, čuoškâigijn]
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Abe: čuoškâittáá

  Noun - lievlâ:
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Nom: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Gen: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Acc: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Ill: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Loc: lievlâst
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Com: lievláin
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Abe: lievlâttáá
    lievlâ+N+Ess: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Par: lievlâd
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Nom: lievlah
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Gen: lievlâi
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Acc: lievlâid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Ill: lievláid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Loc: lievlâin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Com: [lievlâiguin, lievlâigijn]
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Abe: lievlâittáá

  Noun - njuhčâ:
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuhčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuuvčâst
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuvččáin
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuvčâttáá
    njuhčâ+N+Ess: njuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Par: njuhčâd
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuuvčah
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Gen: [njuuvčâi, njuvčâi]
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuuvčâid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuvččáid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuuvčâin
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Com: [njuvčâiguin, njuvčâigijn]
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuvčâittáá
